California statutes. Vehicle Code
Any person who operates, or any owner or farm labor contractor who knowingly allows the operation of, a farm labor vehicle in violation of subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 31401 or Section 31402 or 31403 is guilty of a misdemeanor. When a person has been convicted of willfully violating those provisions, the person shall, in addition, be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation, and no part of the fine may be suspended. If passengers are in the vehicle at the time of the violation, the person shall, in addition, be fined five hundred dollars ($500) for each passenger, not to exceed a total of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, and no part of this fine may be suspended. As used in this section, the terms “knowingly” and “willfully” have the same meaning as prescribed in Section 7 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 556, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

31405.

(a) Except as authorized under paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), every farm labor vehicle issued an inspection certificate under Section 31401 shall be equipped at each passenger position with a Type 1 or Type 2 seatbelt assembly, conforming to the specifications set forth in Section 571.209 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that is anchored to the vehicle in a manner that conforms to the specifications of Section 571.210 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Except as authorized under paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), the department may not issue an initial inspection certificate under Section 31401 to any farm labor vehicle that is not equipped with a seatbelt assembly at each passenger position, as described in subdivision (a).

(c) The owner of a farm labor vehicle shall maintain all seatbelt assemblies and seatbelt assembly anchorages required under this section in good working order for the use of passengers.

(d) Except as authorized under paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) or subdivision (d) of Section 23116, no person may operate a farm labor vehicle on a highway unless that person and all passengers are properly restrained by a seatbelt assembly that conforms to this section.

(e) (1) Until January 1, 2007, this section does not apply to a farm labor vehicle that meets the definition in subdivision (a) of Section 233, meets all state and federal standards for safety and construction, and is not currently required to have seatbelts.

(2) On or after January 1, 2007, any farm labor vehicle that meets the conditions set forth in paragraph (1) shall be equipped at each passenger position with a seatbelt assembly as described in subdivision (a), unless exempted from this requirement under the regulations promulgated under Section 31401.

(f) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 308, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

31406.

(a) No person may be transported in a farm labor vehicle that does not have all passenger seating positions in compliance with Section 571.207 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that provision exists now or may hereafter be amended.

(b) No person may install a seat or seating system in a farm labor vehicle unless that seat or seating system is in compliance with Section 571.207 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that provision exists now or may hereafter be amended.

(c) This section shall become operative on March 31, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 308, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Section operative March 31, 2002, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

31407.

All cutting tools or tools with sharp edges carried in the passenger compartment of a farm labor vehicle shall be placed in securely latched containers that are firmly attached to the vehicle. All other tools, equipment, or materials carried in the passenger compartment shall be secured to the body of the vehicle to prevent their movement while the vehicle is in motion. Under no circumstances shall those tools, equipment, or materials obstruct an aisle or an emergency exit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 308, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

31408.

No person may operate a farm labor vehicle on a highway unless both headlamps required under Section 24400 are lighted, regardless of the time of day.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 556, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

31409.

Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 322, any vehicle owned or operated by or for a public transit system that is purchased with funds appropriated pursuant to Item 2660-103-0046 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2000 (Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2000) or pursuant to Section 5309 of Title 49 of the United States Code and is used to transport farmworkers for any farmworker transportation program shall comply with the farm labor vehicle provisions contained in, and the regulations promulgated under, this chapter, relating to the following:

(a) (1) Annual farm labor vehicle inspection and certification.

(2) Following initial certification, the inspection and certification of buses designed, used, or maintained for carrying more than 15 persons, including the driver, shall be conducted during the inspection required by subdivision (c) of Section 34501.

(b) Seatbelt installation.

(c) Illumination of headlamps.

(d) Storage and securing of tools in passenger compartments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 308, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Tank Containers [31540. - 31540.]

31540.

(a) The department shall adopt and enforce such regulations as it determines are necessary for public safety regarding the transportation of:

(1) Freight van or tank containers which can be removed from the running gear or chassis of a truck or trailer, and

(2) Collapsible containers used to transport liquids on flatbed vehicles.

(b) It is unlawful to fail to comply with any provision of the regulations adopted by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Waste Tires [31560. - 31560.]

31560.

(a) A person operating a vehicle, or combination of vehicles, in the transportation of 10 or more used tires or waste tires, or a combination of used tires and waste tires totaling 10 or more, as defined in Section 42950 of the Public Resources Code, shall be registered with the California Integrated Waste Management Board, unless specifically exempted, as provided in Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 42950) of Part 3 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code and in regulations adopted by the board to implement that chapter.

(b) It is unlawful and constitutes an infraction for a person engaged in the transportation of 10 or more used tires or waste tires, or a combination of used tires and waste tires totaling 10 or more, to violate a provision of this article or Section 42951 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 696, Sec. 31.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14. TRANSPORTATION OF EXPLOSIVES [31600. - 31620.]

31600.

For the purposes of this division “explosive” or “explosives” means any substance, or combination of substances, the primary or common purpose of which is detonation or rapid combustion and which is capable of a relatively instantaneous or rapid release of gas and heat. “Explosive” or “explosives” includes, but is not necessarily limited to, explosives as defined in Section 12000 of the Health and Safety Code, and any of the following:

(a) Dynamite, nitroglycerine, picric acid, lead azide, fulminate of mercury, black powder, smokeless powder, propellant explosives, detonating primers, blasting caps, commercial boosters, ammonium nitrate-fuel oil mixture (blasting agent), or any explosives as defined in Section 841 of Title 18 of the United States Code and published pursuant to Section 555.23 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, when transported in a combined load with any explosive, as defined in this section.

(b) Substances determined to be division 1.1, 1.2, 1.3, or 1.6 explosives as classified by the United States Department of Transportation.

(c) “Explosive” or “explosives” does not include small arms ammunition or any other division 1.4 explosive.

(d) This division shall not apply to special fireworks classified by the United States Department of Transportation as division 1.2 or 1.3 explosives when those special fireworks are regulated by and in conformance with Part 2 (commencing with Section 12500) of Division 11 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Nothing in this chapter supersedes any regulations for the transportation of hazardous materials as defined in Section 2402.7 or as regulated in Division 14.1 (commencing with Section 32000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 247, Sec. 17.   Effective August 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

31601.

(a) This division shall apply to the operation of any motor vehicle on any highway, and to the operation and parking of any vehicle on any property designated pursuant to this division as a safe stopping place for the purpose of transporting any explosive in any amount when the transportation is rendered as a delivery service or for hire, or in any other event for the purpose of transporting any explosive or a combined load of any explosive and ammonium nitrate-fuel oil mixture (blasting agent) in an amount in excess of 1,000 pounds. The transportation of quantities of explosives of 1,000 pounds or less, or other than on a public highway, is governed by Division 11 (commencing at Section 12000) of the Health and Safety Code. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, a license required by Section 31602 may be used to transport quantities of less than 1,000 pounds of explosives if all other requirements of this division are met. 

(b) It is the legislative intention in enacting this division and with particular reference to requiring licenses for transportation of explosives as set forth herein that such provisions shall apply uniformly throughout the State of California and that such license to be obtained from the Department of the California Highway Patrol, as provided in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 2500) of Division 2, shall be in lieu of any requirement for any license to be obtained by any such owner from any local authority within the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 912, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

31602.

(a) It is a misdemeanor for any owner of a vehicle to drive or permit the driving of the vehicle on any public highway for the purpose of transporting any explosive as defined herein and within the scope of Section 31601 unless the owner then holds a valid license for the transportation of explosives as provided in this division, except such persons as are expressly exempted in this division.

(b) It is a misdemeanor for the owner, or authorized agent of the owner, of any vehicle transporting explosives to drive, or to permit the driving of the vehicle, or for the driver to drive such vehicle, upon any public highway, not designated in regulations adopted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol as a route for the transportation of explosives, unless the use of the highway is required to permit delivery of, or the loading of, explosives at a point not on a highway designated as a route for the transportation of explosives, or unless the use of the highway is required to permit the vehicle to proceed to, and return from, a point designated as an inspection stop pursuant to this division.

(c) It is a misdemeanor for the driver of any vehicle transporting explosives to stop at any place not designated as a safe stopping place unless the vehicle is disabled or except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or to comply with the orders of a peace officer or an official traffic control device. A safe stopping place is any location designated by the Department of the California Highway Patrol where the driver may stop for food, fuel or other necessary reasons and any location designated by the Department of the California Highway Patrol as a safe parking place, a safe stopping place, or as an inspection stop for purposes of this division.

(d) In the event the owner of a vehicle leases the same to be used in the transportation of explosives for which a license is required, the lessee shall be deemed the owner for the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1315.)
-------------------------------------------

31607.

(a) Any person operating or permitting the operation of a vehicle or combination of vehicles used in the transportation of explosives and subject to this division shall make or cause to be made an inspection of every said vehicle or combination of vehicles as hereinafter set forth.

(b) Such inspection as called for in Section 31608 shall be made immediately preceding the actual transportation of explosives by the vehicle and whenever there is an interchange of any vehicle operating in combination with any other vehicle in the transportation of explosives.

(c) Inspection of tires and brakes shall also be made en route at suitable intervals, off the roadway, at inspection stops established by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, at regular stops, terminal points, or driver-change points.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 228.)
-------------------------------------------

31608.

The inspection of a vehicle required under subdivision (b) of Section 31607 shall include inspection of the following:

(a) Brakes and the brake system.

(b) The ignition and lighting systems.

(c) All tires on the equipment.

(d) All supplemental equipment as required by Section 31610.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

31609.

Every person operating a vehicle or combination of vehicles in the transportation of explosives subject to this division shall complete a record of every inspection which is required under Sections 31607 and 31608 in such form as approved by the Department of the California Highway Patrol showing the time and place of every inspection. The person making the inspection shall certify the fact in the record. The forms may be based upon the type used by the United States Department of Transportation. The record of every inspection shall be made at the time such inspection is conducted.

The driver of the vehicle shall display the record upon demand of any member of the California Highway Patrol or any police officer of a city who is on duty for the exclusive or main purpose of enforcing the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1315.)
-------------------------------------------

31610.

Every vehicle or combination of vehicles used in the transportation of explosives and subject to this division, in addition to any other equipment required by law, shall be equipped and maintained as required by this section.

(a) Brakes and the brake system shall be maintained in good and safe operating condition.

(b) The ignition and lighting systems shall be maintained in good operating condition.

(c) All tires shall be in good condition, properly matched and inflated. Except as may be necessary to cause immediate replacement, no vehicle shall be driven unless all tires in actual use on the vehicle are properly inflated.

(d) Fire extinguishers and other safety equipment prescribed by regulations adopted by the department pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 34500 and Section 34501 shall be carried in each vehicle or combination of vehicles.

(e) No flare, fusee, oil lantern, or any signal device producing a flame shall be carried upon any vehicle or combination of vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 754.)
-------------------------------------------

31611.

Every owner of a vehicle used in the transportation of explosives and subject to this division shall make available in each vehicle the latest map showing the routes which are to be used for the transportation of explosives which has been furnished for the vehicle by the Department of the California Highway Patrol and a list of the safe stopping places prescribed by the regulations of the Department of the California Highway Patrol for vehicles transporting explosives. The owner shall require that the driver be thoroughly familiar with the provisions of this division before operating any vehicle in the transportation of explosives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 754.)
-------------------------------------------

31612.

Persons operating vehicles, or combinations of vehicles, in the transportation of explosives and subject to this division, shall not accept any explosives for transportation unless the shipment is accompanied by a bill of lading or other shipping paper supplied by the shipper, showing the kind of explosives and bearing a statement that they have been packaged, labeled and marked in accordance with regulations of the United States Department of Transportation, and the bill of lading or other shipping paper shall be carried in the vehicle while en route and shall be displayed upon demand of any member of the California Highway Patrol or any police officer of a city who is on duty for the exclusive or main purpose of enforcing the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1315.)
-------------------------------------------

31613.

There shall not be included in any cargo of explosives any flammable liquids, acids, or corrosive liquids, oxidizers, or combustible materials, other than the explosives themselves, which may have such characteristics. Blasting caps or detonators shall not be transported upon the same vehicle with other explosives, nor shall electric blasting caps be transported upon any vehicle equipped with a radio transmitter. The foregoing provisions of this section shall be subject to such exceptions as are permitted by the United States Department of Transportation loading chart for cargoes of explosives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1315.)
-------------------------------------------

31614.

The following provisions shall apply to any vehicle transporting explosives subject to this division:

(a) When transporting explosives through or into a city or any other congested area for which a route has not been designated by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, drivers shall follow such routes as may be prescribed or established by local authorities.

(b) Where routes are not prescribed by local authority, every driver of a vehicle transporting explosives shall avoid, so far as practicable, and, where feasible, by prearrangement of routes, driving into or through congested thoroughfares, places where crowds are assembled, streetcar tracks, tunnels, viaducts, and dangerous crossings.

(c) No driver or other person in charge of any vehicle on any public or private property shall permit any explosive to be loaded into, or on, or to be unloaded from any motor vehicle with the engine running, and, whenever any loading operation is in progress, the parking brake on the motor vehicle shall be securely set and all reasonable precautions taken to prevent movement of the motor vehicle during loading or unloading.

(d) No driver or other person in charge of such vehicle shall operate or permit the operation of any vehicle transporting explosives unless all of that portion of the lading which consists of explosives is contained entirely within the body of the motor vehicle or within the horizontal outline thereof, without overhang or projection of any part of the load, and if such motor vehicle has a tailboard or tailgate it shall be closed and secured in place during such transportation.

(e) Every motor vehicle transporting explosives shall have either a closed body or have the explosive cargo covered with a fire- and water-resistant tarpaulin, and in either event, care shall be taken to protect the load from moisture and sparks. Subject to other exceptions as are permitted by the United States Department of Transportation regulations, explosives may be transported on flat-bed vehicles if the explosive portion of the load on each vehicle is packed in fire- and water-resistant containers or covered with a fire- and water-resistant tarpaulin.

(f) No person shall operate any vehicle transporting explosives past any fire of any kind burning on or near the highway until the driver ascertains that such passing can be made with safety.

(g) No motor vehicle transporting explosives shall be left unattended upon any street or highway except in extreme emergency. The vehicle shall be deemed attended whenever a driver or person in charge thereof is in or upon the vehicle or is in a position to observe the vehicle at all times. The driver or person in charge of a vehicle transporting explosives may, however, leave the vehicle unattended at any place designated as a safe parking place on the list of safe stopping places prepared by the Department of the California Highway Patrol unless conditions exist, which are known to the driver, which make it unreasonable to do so.

(h) No driver or other person shall smoke or light any match or otherwise have or produce any fire or flame while in, upon, or near any vehicle transporting explosives.

(i) No person shall transport any explosives in a passenger vehicle, or bus, which is subject to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 754.)
-------------------------------------------

31615.

Nothing contained in this division shall be deemed to exempt any vehicle transporting explosives and subject to this division, or the owner or any other person, from other provisions of this code, but all such other provisions relating to the driving and movement of vehicles, the size, weight, and equipment thereof, shall be deemed to apply as applicable to each and every vehicle engaged in transporting explosives subject to this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

31616.

The Department of the California Highway Patrol, after consultation with the officials having the responsibility for the prevention and suppression of fire in communities through which routes for the transporting of explosives pass, representatives of transportation companies concerned, explosives manufacturers, and the State Fire Marshal shall, by regulation, designate the routes in this state which are to be used for the transportation of explosives. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall prepare for distribution to persons engaged in the transportation of explosives, maps which clearly indicate the routes, as established in regulations, which are to be used for the transportation of explosives. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall prepare for distribution to persons engaged in the transportation of explosives a list of locations of required inspection stops, safe parking places, and safe stopping places and shall revise the list to keep it current. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that, for the purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 11346.4 of the Government Code, the public comment period shall be 30 days, and the regulations shall become effective upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 63, Sec. 1.   Effective March 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

31616.5.

Notwithstanding Section 11349.3 of the Government Code, the review by the Office of Administrative Law of regulations adopted pursuant to Section 31616 shall be completed within 15 days after the regulations have been submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   Effective March 30, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

31617.

In the event of an emergency, the Department of the California Highway Patrol is authorized to suspend or change any designated route for the transportation of explosives or to temporarily designate new or additional routes for such transportation. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall, unless the nature of the emergency makes it impracticable to do so, consult with local fire officials in the area or areas affected before making any such changes or new designations. If the changes or new designations are made before they can be discussed with those officials, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall immediately notify the appropriate officials of his action.

The change in or new designation of routes shall not be effective for more than 90 days from the date of such action, unless the Department of the California Highway Patrol determines that the change or new designation should become permanent, in which case the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall, within the 90-day period, initiate action to make the change or new designation permanent in accordance with the provisions of Section 31616 and in which case the emergency change or designation shall remain in effect until superseded by a regulation of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1315.)
-------------------------------------------

31618.

Where not specifically provided otherwise, it is a misdemeanor for any person to violate any provision of this division. Every person convicted of a misdemeanor for a violation of any of the provisions of this division shall be punished as follows:

(a) For a first violation, by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both fine and imprisonment.

(b) For a second or subsequent violation, by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

31619.

When not in conflict with any local ordinance pertaining to the transportation of explosives, it shall be lawful to transport smokeless powder in an amount not exceeding 100 pounds if packed in containers prescribed by the United States Department of Transportation upon a highway not designated by the Department of the California Highway Patrol as a route for the transportation of explosives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1315.)
-------------------------------------------

31620.

The Department of the California Highway Patrol, upon application of any interested party, with the concurrence of the fire chief or chiefs in the area or areas affected, and if he determines that such action may be taken without jeopardizing the public safety, may suspend, or waive compliance with, the whole or any part of the requirements of this division insofar as they apply to the delivery or transportation of explosives in sparsely populated, unincorporated areas or in any area where there may be practical difficulties or unnecessary or unreasonable hardship in carrying out the provisions of this division. No person shall be charged with any crime for any violation of the provisions of this division when such a suspension or waiver by the Department of the California Highway Patrol is in effect in the area in which the alleged violation occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1315.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14.1. TRANSPORTATION OF HAZARDOUS MATERIAL [32000. - 32053.]



CHAPTER 1. Licensing [32000. - 32004.]

32000.

It is the intent of the Legislature, by enacting this division, that the public be provided additional protection through the licensing of motor carriers transporting hazardous material. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall be authorized to inspect and license the motor carriers with special attention directed to the negligent operators or repeat violators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 860, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

32000.5.

(a) A motor carrier who directs the transportation of an explosive and a motor carrier who directs the transportation of a hazardous material, who is required to display placards pursuant to Section 27903, and a motor carrier who transports for a fee in excess of 500 pounds of hazardous materials of the type requiring placards pursuant to Section 27903, shall be licensed in accordance with this code, unless specifically exempted by this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code. This license shall be available for examination and shall be displayed in accordance with the regulations adopted by the commissioner.

(b) (1) Except as provided in Section 32001, this division shall not apply to a
 person hauling only hazardous waste, as defined in Section 25115 or 25117 of the Health and Safety Code, and who is registered pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25163 of the Health and Safety Code or who is exempt from that registration pursuant to subdivision (b) of that section.

(2) A motor carrier that is transporting a hazardous waste and is required to display placards pursuant to Section 27903 shall comply with all provisions of Section 32001 except paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of that section.

(c) This division does not apply to implements of husbandry, as defined in Section 36000.

(d) This division does not apply to the hauling of division 1.3 explosives classified as special fireworks or to division 1.4 explosives classified as common fireworks by the United States Department of Transportation if
 those fireworks are transported by a motor carrier under the authority of, and in conformance with, a license issued to the motor carrier by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 12500) of Division 11 of the Health and Safety Code. In that case, a copy of the license shall be carried in the vehicle and presented to a peace officer upon request.

(e) (1) The department shall not issue a license to transport hazardous materials to a motor carrier unless each terminal from which hazardous materials carrying vehicles are operated is in compliance with Section 34501.12 and is currently rated satisfactory.

(2) The department shall adopt rules and regulations that provide for a temporary license to transport hazardous materials for a carrier who, within the previous three years, has not been issued an unsatisfactory rating as a result of
 an inspection conducted pursuant to Section 34501, 34501.12, or 34520.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that a carrier’s license to transport hazardous materials should not be unreasonably hindered as a result of the department’s verification and issuance process.

(f) This section does not prevent the department from issuing a new or initial license to transport hazardous materials to a motor carrier that applies for a license to transport hazardous materials and that, within the previous three years, has been issued an unsatisfactory rating as a result of an inspection conducted pursuant to Section 34501, 34501.12, or 34520, if the motor carrier has
 corrected the unsatisfactory rating before applying for the license to transport hazardous materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 111, Sec. 1.   (AB 463)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32001.

(a) (1) Any authorized employee of the department may inspect any sealed or unsealed vehicle, container, or shipment subject to this division in maintenance facilities, terminals, or other public or private property to ascertain the quantity and kind of hazardous material and to ensure compliance with the provisions of this code and regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(2) If a seal is opened for inspection, the department shall reseal any vehicle, container, or shipment prior to further transportation.

(b) Unless specifically stated, nothing contained in this division shall be deemed to exempt any vehicle transporting a hazardous material subject to this division or the operator or any other person from other provisions of this code.

(c) No motor carrier shall direct the transportation of any shipment of a hazardous material in any vehicle unless all of the following are complied with:

(1) The vehicle is equipped as required by this code and applicable regulations adopted pursuant to law.

(2) The shipment complies with laws and regulations pertaining to the shipment or transportation of hazardous material.

(3) The motor carrier holds a valid license for the transportation of hazardous materials.

(4) (A) A vehicle or combination of vehicles required to display placards pursuant to Section 27903 is equipped with a two-way communication device, maintained in good working order, that enables the driver to contact the personnel responsible for the safety operations of the motor carrier in the event of an emergency.

(B) For the purposes of this section, “two-way communication device” means a radio, cellular telephone, or other similar device that permits communication between the driver and personnel responsible for the safety operations of the motor carrier.

(5) (A) The enclosed cargo body, when the display of placards is required pursuant to Section 27903, shall be locked and remain locked during transit of the hazardous materials so as to prevent any unauthorized entry and shall be opened only during loading, unloading, or at the direction of a peace officer, an authorized employee of the department, or a person authorized pursuant to Section 25185 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A driver transporting hazardous material in a locked cargo body shall verify that all locks are in place if the vehicle has been left unattended for any length of time. Each driver shall make a notation in his or her log book of the time and date that the verification occurred.

(C) For the purposes of this section, “cargo body” means a fully enclosed area that is an integral part of the vehicle and designed to encapsulate the entire load, such as a van body or an intermodal freight container, and does not mean a tank or flatbed type of vehicle.

(d) The commissioner may issue exemptions from the provisions of this section.

(e) Nothing in this section shall limit the ability of other state or local agencies to carry out their regulatory, enforcement, or emergency response duties under other provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 610, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32002.

(a) The commissioner may adopt any regulations that are necessary to administer this division. It is a misdemeanor for any motor carrier to violate this division or regulations adopted pursuant to this division.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), it is unlawful for the motor carrier or the person who directs the driver to operate a vehicle transporting hazardous material, when that transportation requires a license pursuant to this division, to cause the operation of the vehicle unless the motor carrier holds a valid license for the transportation of hazardous materials. A violation of this subdivision shall be punished as follows:

(1) For a first violation, by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(2) For a second or subsequent violation, by a fine of not less than four thousand dollars ($4,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

32002.5.

(a) The commissioner may temporarily suspend a license to haul hazardous material prior to any hearing, when, in the commissioner’s opinion, the action is necessary to prevent an imminent and substantial danger to the public health. The commissioner shall notify the holder of the license of the temporary suspension and the effective date thereof and, at the same time, shall serve the person with an accusation. Upon receipt of a notice of defense to the accusation, the commissioner shall set the matter for a hearing which shall be held as soon as possible, but not later than 10 days after receipt of the notice of defense. The temporary suspension shall remain in effect until the hearing is completed and the commissioner has made a final determination on the merits, which, in any event, shall be made within 10 days after the completion of the hearing. If the determination is not transmitted within 10 days after the hearing is completed, the temporary suspension is of no further effect.

(b) The commissioner shall suspend a license to transport hazardous material of a person or motorcarrier, for a period of at least 90 days but not more than 180 days, if the holder of the license permits the transportation of fissile class III shipments or highway route controlled quantity radioactive materials, as defined in Subpart I (commencing with Section 173.401) of Part 173 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, by a person who does not possess a license of the appropriate class and an attached radioactive materials driver’s certificate or an endorsement issued under Article 6 (commencing with Section 15275) of Chapter 7 of Division 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 92.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

32003.

(a) All fees collected by the department pursuant to the issuance or renewal of a license for the transportation of hazardous material shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account of the State Transportation Fund.

(b) All moneys collected from these fees shall be used for the support of the hazardous materials inspection and licensing program of the department upon appropriation therefor by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 860, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

32004.

Any violation of any provision of this division may be enjoined in a civil action brought by the Attorney General in the name of the people of the State of California, upon request of the department, except that it shall not be necessary to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 860, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Notification of Routes [32050. - 32053.]

32050.
